Illinois, session 104th, SB2568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $567,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Procurement Policy Board for its ordinary and contingent 8expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.